Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 1, chapter 659, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  following amounts are estab-
lished for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits  for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds
and federal funds,  collected or received by the state agencies listed, for the acquisition of land and
the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing, furnishing and equipping of buildings  and
facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
(a) Deferred Maintenance ..................... $ 15,500,000
(b) Gender Neutral Facilities
and Mothers’ Rooms ......................... $ 10,000,000
(c) Capitol Mall Parking
Structure Improvements .................. $ 2,750,000
(d) Dome Building and
Yaquina Hall Improvements ........... $ 1,500,000
(e) Climate Adaptation and
Net Zero Solutions ............................ $ 2,000,000
(f) Parking Lot Improvements
and EV Charging Station
Expansions ..........................................$ 2,000,000
(g) Executive Building Interior
and Seismic Renovation ................... $ 45,000,000
(h) North Valley Complex
Infrastructure Upgrades/
[Tenant Improvements ....................... $ 60,000,000]
Tenant Improvements ............... $ 77,000,000
(i) Yellow Parking Lot Paving ............ $ 4,000,000
(j) State Facilities Security
and Capital Improvements ........ $ 10,000,000
(2) Oregon Military Department:
Enrolled Senate Bill 5702 (SB 5702-A) Page 1
(a) Ashland Armory Service
Life Extension .................................... $ 5,373,235
(b) Corvallis Armory Service
Life Extension .................................... $ 4,317,605
(c) Washington County
Readiness Center ............................... $ 5,300,000
(3) Oregon Youth Authority:
(a) Camp Riverbend Dorm
Renovation ..........................................$ 6,867,101
(b) Capital Improvements ...................... $ 6,742,239
(c) MacLaren West Cottages
Renovations ........................................$ 8,000,000
(d) Tillamook Dorm
Renovation ..........................................$ 10,279,899
(4) Department of Corrections:
(a) Capital Improvement and
Renewal ...............................................$ 70,000,000
(b) Off-Net Telephone
Infrastructure ..................................... $ 3,508,206
(5) Oregon State Police:
(a) Central Point Office Expansion ..... $ 33,961,269
(b) Springfield Forensic Lab and
Medical Examiner’s Office .............. $ 61,982,733
(c) Springfield Patrol Area
Command Office ................................ $ 14,261,687
(6) Department of Transportation:
(a) Meacham Maintenance
Station .................................................$ 12,000,000
(b) South Coast Maintenance
Station .................................................$ 16,200,000
(c) Region 3-5 Headquarters
HVAC Upgrades ................................ $ 3,800,000
(7) Oregon Department of
Aviation, Siletz Bay State
Airport Runway and
Electrical Rehabilitation ................. $ 320,000
(8) State Forestry Department:
(a) Santiam District Office
Replacement .......................................$ 2,500,000
(b) Toledo Facility
Replacement Phase II ...................... $ 1,632,842
(9) Oregon Department of
Fish and Wildlife, Capital
Improvement and Renewal .............. $ 5,000,000
(10) State Parks and Recreation
Department, Capital
Improvement and Renewal .............. $ 50,000,000
(11) Oregon Health Authority:
(a) OSH Salem Well Water
Treatment Facility ............................ $ 4,492,750
(b) OSH Salem/Junction City
Automated Dispensing
Enrolled Senate Bill 5702 (SB 5702-A) Page 2
Cabinets...............................................$ 3,500,000
(12) Housing and Community
Services Department,
Local Innovation and Fast
Track (LIFT) Housing,
Permanent Supportive
Housing................................................$ 410,000,000
(13) Oregon Liquor Control
Commission:
(a) Liquor Warehouse
[Conveyor System ............................... $ 10,000,000]
Conveyor System ...................... $ 15,000,000
(b) Liquor Warehouse
[Land and Building ........................... $ 52,537,265]
Land and Building..................... $130,455,048
(14) Department of Education:
(a) Oregon School for the
Deaf ADA Restrooms ....................... $ 1,024,625
(b) Oregon School for the
Deaf Fire Alarm
System Replacement ......................... $ 3,091,923
(c) Oregon School for the
Deaf Windows Upgrade ................... $ 1,383,452
(15) Judicial Department,
Supreme Court Building
Renovation ..........................................$ 21,700,000
(16) Legislative Administration
Committee, Capitol
Accessibility, Maintenance
and Safety Phase III ................. $ 19,630,000
SECTION 2.
 Section 3, chapter 659, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of [ $445,905,100]
$475,905,100 is established for a six-year period beginning July 1,  2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission, for expenditures of proceeds  from state bonds issued for the benefit of a public
university, pursuant to agreements between the commission and a public university.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Legislative Administration Committee,  for a six-year period beginning July 1,
2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $223,081,000, for the third phase of the  Oregon
State Capitol Accessibility, Maintenance and Safety capital improvements.
SECTION 4. The Legislative Assembly approves the proposal of the  Oregon Military De-
partment, submitted in accordance with ORS 396.515 (4), for  the sale of the Silverton Ar-
mory.
SECTION 5. This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5702 (SB 5702-A) Page 3
Passed by Senate March 3, 2022
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 4, 2022
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5702 (SB 5702-A) Page 4